Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 7
AFFILIATION OF PLANS WITH THE ASSOCIATION

31-31-701. Affiliation by old hire pension plans.

Any employer may elect affiliation with the association relating to an old hire fire or police pension plan that it has established pursuant to article 30.5 of this title by filing with the board a resolution approved as to form by the fire and police pension association and adopted by the employer. The effective date of affiliation must be mutually agreed upon by the employer and the association.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.)

On the effective date of affiliation pursuant to this section, the assets of the old hire pension plan shall be transferred to the trust fund created by subsection (6) of this section. The amount of the transfer must equal the market value of such assets at the close of business on date of affiliation. Upon affiliation and the transfer of assets to the fund, benefits due pursuant to the old hire plan shall be paid by the association from the assets of the plan.

An eligible employer may request of the board, prior to filing a resolution of affiliation, an estimate of the employer's contribution rate necessary to comply with the contribution requirements established by subsection (5) of this section.

An employer that affiliates pursuant to this section shall annually contribute an amount approved by the board, upon advice of its actuary, to pay the normal cost plus amortize the unfunded past service liability attributed to old hire members hired prior to April 8, 1978, over a period not to exceed the lesser of twenty years or the number of years equal to the average remaining life expectancy of the pension fund's members.

There is hereby created the old hire plan members' benefit trust fund that consists of the assets of old hire plans administered and managed by the board pursuant to this section. The board shall keep an accurate account of each such individual old hire plan.

The fire and police pension association has the following responsibilities for affiliated plans:

Investing the assets of the plan, including determining the allocation of assets;

Collecting and accounting for contributions to the plan;

Distributing benefits provided under the plan as directed by the employer or its agent and issuing tax forms and filing tax reports regarding distributions;

Conducting actuarial valuations and audits of the plan as are required by statute or by regulatory bodies;

Maintaining records and reporting the investments, assets, and benefits of the plan as required by statute or by regulatory bodies;

Authorizing the payment of expenses of the plan from the assets of the plan. Any expenses that are incurred by the association which are directly related to the association's administration of the plan shall be paid from that plan's assets. Any expenses that are incurred by the association which are attributable to more than one plan administered by the association shall be allocated to each plan on an equitable basis as determined by the association. The allocated expense shall be paid from the assets of each plan.

Taking such other actions as may be allowed or required by statute.

The local old hire pension board has the following responsibilities for an affiliated plan:

Establishing eligibility for and the amount of benefits to be received by members and beneficiaries of the plan, including but not limited to determination of base salaries, years of service under the plan, marital status, and continuing eligibility of members and survivors;

Maintaining records of the terms and provisions of the plan, as they may be adopted and amended;

Making determinations regarding benefit or cost-of-living adjustments and rank escalation, if any;

Periodically certifying information required by the association to administer the plan benefits; and

Electing options for the allocation of assets, if such options are provided by the association.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 921, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2006:

(3) amended and (6) added, p. 195, § 20, effective March 31.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-031), ch. 52, p. 245, § 7, effective March 20.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-31-1003 (3).

31-31-702. Affiliation by local money purchase plans. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 922, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2010:

Entire section repealed, (SB 10-024), ch. 20, p. 89, § 1, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1003.3.

31-31-703. Money purchase plan benefit trust fund - creation - management. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 922, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

(1), (2), (5), and (6) amended, p. 15, § 6, effective March 13.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 51, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1204, § 77, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 195, § 21, effective March 31.

L. 2010:

Entire section repealed, (SB 10-024), ch. 20, p. 89, § 2, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1012.3.

31-31-704. Optional affiliation by social security employers.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until January 1, 2023.] Prior to January 1, 2007, and notwithstanding the exemption provided in section 31-31-401 (1)(a), any employer that covers members under the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, or any county that covers salaried employees whose duties are directly involved with the provision of law enforcement or fire protection, as certified by the county under the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, may have elected affiliation with the association, either as to coverage under the statewide death and disability plan or as to retirement under the statewide defined benefit plan, or as to both, by filing with the board a resolution of the governing body of such employer, but any such affiliation shall either exclude past service credit or include past service credit funded by contribution levels established by the board.

(1) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective January 1, 2023.]

Prior to January 1, 2007, and notwithstanding the exemption provided in section 31-31-401 (1)(a), any employer that covers members under the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, or any county that covers salaried employees whose duties are directly involved with the provision of law enforcement or fire protection, as certified by the county under the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, may have elected affiliation with the association, either as to coverage under the statewide death and disability plan or as to retirement under the statewide defined benefit plan, or as to both, by filing with the board a resolution of the governing body of such employer, but any such affiliation shall either exclude past service credit or include past service credit funded by contribution levels established by the board.

On or about January 1, 2023, participation by members employed by social security employers who elected optional affiliation pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be transferred to the statewide retirement plan pursuant to the merger described in section 31-31-412.

(1.5) to (4) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2012.)

(5) Benefits provided pursuant to the statewide defined benefit and statewide death and disability plans established by this article to members of employers that have affiliated pursuant to this section prior to January 1, 2007, shall be reduced by the pro rata amount of any social security benefit received by the member attributable to the member's quarters of social security coverage derived from employment as a member.

(6) to (10) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2012.)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 924, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2003:

(1) and (3) amended and (1.5) and (3.5) added, p. 1232, § 4, effective August 6.

L. 2006:

(2) amended and (9) and (10) added, p. 101, § 2, effective March 27.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1018), ch. 24, p. 62, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 307, § 10, effective January 1, 2023.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1003.5.

Cross references:

For the federal "Social Security Act", see 42 U.S.C. sec. 301 et seq. For the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", see title 26 of the United States Code.

31-31-704.5. Entry for social security employers.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until January 1, 2023.]

Notwithstanding the exemption provided in section 31-31-401 (1)(a), any employer that covers members under the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, or any county that covers salaried employees under the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, whose duties are directly involved with the provision of law enforcement or fire protection as certified by the county may elect coverage under the social security supplemental plan established pursuant to section 31-31-704.6 by filing a resolution of affiliation with the board pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. Election of coverage under the plan shall be irrevocable.

The board may allow an employer eligible for participation in the social security supplemental plan pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section to alternatively elect to participate in one or more of the plans within the defined benefit system with full benefits and unreduced contribution rates. Such participation shall be as provided by rules adopted by the board. The board may determine a continuing rate of contribution for all members who are active on the effective date of coverage to fund benefits as may be necessary to ensure that the affiliating employers' coverage shall not have an adverse financial impact on the actuarial soundness of the plan.

A county electing to affiliate with the association shall make such election through the county's governing board. For purposes of administering to counties affiliated pursuant to this section, any county electing to affiliate shall be included in the definition of "employer", as defined in section 31-31-102 (3), and any covered employee of such county shall be included in the definition of "member", as defined in section 31-31-102 (4).

(1) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective January 1, 2023.]

(a) (I) Notwithstanding the exemption provided in section 31-31-401 (1)(a), any employer that covers members under the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, or any county that covers salaried employees under the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, whose duties are peace officers or firefighters as certified by the county may elect coverage under the statewide retirement plan social security supplemental component established pursuant to article 31.5 of this title 31 by filing a resolution of affiliation with the board pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. Election of coverage under the plan shall be irrevocable.

(II) The board may allow an employer eligible for participation in the social security pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section to alternatively elect to participate in other lifetime benefit components of the statewide retirement plan with full benefits and unreduced contribution rates. Such participation shall be as provided by rules adopted by the board. The board may determine a continuing rate of contribution for all members who are active on the effective date of coverage to fund benefits as may be necessary to ensure that the affiliating employers' coverage shall not have an adverse financial impact on the actuarial soundness of the plan.

(b) A county electing to affiliate with the association for the purpose of providing coverage of its peace officers or firefighters shall make such election through the county's governing board. For purposes of administering to counties affiliated pursuant to this section, any county electing to affiliate shall be included in the definition of "employer", as defined in section 31-31-102 (3), and any covered peace officer or firefighter of such county shall be included in the definition of "member", as defined in section 31-31-102 (4).

The employer's resolution applying for coverage by the association shall first be adopted by the governing body of the employer and shall state the employer's intent to cover its members under the plan.

Any application for coverage by the association shall be approved by at least sixty-five percent of all active members employed by the employer at the time of the application who vote in the election proposing the coverage; except that no such election shall be required if:

The employer allows members to elect to remain in a predecessor plan pursuant to association rules or if the members have approved leaving a predecessor plan pursuant to section 24-54-106 (3); and

The employer designates that all future eligible employees will participate in a plan of the association.

The board shall promulgate rules relating to standards for disclosure of all ramifications and procedures for obtaining member approval pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The board shall also promulgate rules relating to standards for granting an employer's application for participation in the plan and for the submission of information to the board by the employer. The rules shall contain a provision specifying that an employer that opts for coverage by the association shall not be permitted to opt out of the coverage at any later date. The board may adopt rules allowing an eligible individual active employee of an affiliating department to elect to remain in a predecessor plan and not have coverage by the association.

An application for coverage by the association filed by an employer shall include the employer's certification to the board:

That all fire and law enforcement employees who are active at the time of affiliation, except those that have elected to remain in a predecessor plan as may be allowed by rule, and all fire and law enforcement employees who are hired after affiliation as certified by the employer, will become participants in the plan and the election to participate in the plan is irrevocable; and

That the employer agrees to participate in the plan and to be bound by the terms of the plan and the decisions and actions of the board with respect to the plan.

An employer that affiliates with the association pursuant to this section shall not be prohibited from participating in other governmental pension or benefit plans to the extent allowed under the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended.

Nothing contained in this section shall affect the ability of an employer to terminate social security coverage or affect the procedures for such termination.

[Editor's note: Subsection (8) is effective January 1, 2023.] Any employer participating in the social security component of the statewide retirement plan created pursuant to article 31.5 of this title 31 may not elect coverage under the statewide death and disability plan under part 8 of this article 31.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 102, § 3, effective March 27.

L. 2012:

(7) added, (HB 12-1018), ch. 24, p. 64, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (SB 17-020), ch. 23, p. 70, § 4, effective March 8.

L. 2019:

(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6) amended, (SB 19-260), ch. 430, p. 3737, § 1, effective August 2; (4) amended, (SB 19-106), ch. 143, p. 1751, § 3, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(1) amended and (8) added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 308, § 11, effective January 1, 2023.

Cross references:

For the federal "Social Security Act", see 42 U.S.C. sec. 301 et seq. For the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", see title 26 of the United States Code.

31-31-704.6. Social security supplemental plan - creation - management - repeal.

The board is authorized to develop, maintain, and amend a social security supplemental plan document, as a component of the defined benefit system, that offers a defined benefit and that is intended to comply with the qualification requirements specified in section 401 of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, that are applicable to governmental plans. The plan shall cover the members of those employers that have elected coverage under the plan pursuant to section 31-31-704.5.

Contributions and earnings of the social security supplemental plan shall be held in trust as part of the defined benefit system trust fund.

The social security supplemental plan document created by the board pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall govern the accrual of service credit, vesting, the benefits to be offered based on age and service, the establishment and payment of contributions, the allocation of contributions towards funding the defined benefit, amendment of the plan, and such other matters as may be necessary to the board's administration and management of the plan.

Upon the effective date of coverage under the social security supplemental plan, each member covered by the plan shall pay one-half of the member contribution rate established in part 4 of this article into the defined benefit plan trust fund. The payment shall be made by the employer by deduction from the salary paid to the member. For each member, the employer shall pay one-half of the employer contribution rate established in part 4 of this article into the defined benefit plan trust fund. Payments are due no later than ten days following the date of payment of salary to the member, unless the salary is paid more than once monthly, in which event the payments are due no later than the tenth day of the month following the month the salary is paid to the member. The payments required by this section are subject to interest if not submitted when due.

Each employer shall pay the employee contributions required for all salaries, and the contributions so paid shall be treated as employer contributions pursuant to section 414 (h)(2) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, in determining tax treatment under the code. The employer shall pay the employee contributions directly to the retirement association, instead of paying the amounts to employees, and the contributions shall be paid from the same funds that are used in paying salaries to the employees. The contributions, although designated as employee contributions, shall be paid by the employer in lieu of contributions by employees. Employees may not elect to choose to receive the contributions directly instead of having them paid by the employer to the pension plan. Employee contributions so paid shall be treated for all purposes of this article, other than federal tax, in the same manner as employee contributions made before the date paid. Payment shall be made by one voucher for the aggregate amount deducted and shall be made no later than the tenth day after the end of each pay period.

Benefits payable under the social security supplemental plan shall be equivalent to one half of the benefits paid under the statewide defined benefit plan.

This section is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 102, § 3, effective March 27.

L. 2015:

(3) amended, (SB 15-027), ch. 9, p. 21, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2022:

(6) added by revision, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 312, §§ 21, 22.

Cross references:

For the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", see title 26 of the United States Code.

31-31-704.7. Participation in statewide death and disability plan - repeal.

Any employer participating in the social security supplemental plan created pursuant to section 31-31-704.6 may not elect coverage under the statewide death and disability plan.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2020.)

This section is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1018), ch. 24, p. 64, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-028), ch. 10, p. 24, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1044), ch. 105, p. 411, § 8, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(3) added by revision, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 312, §sect; 21, 22.

31-31-705. Affiliation by volunteer pension plans.

The board is authorized to make affiliation agreements with governing bodies that provide pension plans for volunteer firefighters to administer such plans and manage the funds of such plans for investment. The fire and police pension association may require periodic renewal of the agreement.

The fire and police pension association has the following responsibilities in connection with a volunteer firefighter pension plan that has an agreement with the association pursuant to subsection (1) of this section:

Investing the assets of the plan, including determining the allocation of assets;

Collecting and accounting for contributions to the plan;

Distributing benefits provided under the plan as directed by the governing body or its agent and issuing tax forms and filing tax reports regarding distributions;

Conducting actuarial valuations and financial audits of the plan on at least a biannual basis or as required by regulatory bodies or by law;

Maintaining records and reporting the investments, assets, and benefits of the plan as required by statute or by regulatory bodies;

Authorizing the payment of expenses of the plan from the assets of the plan. Any expenses that are incurred by the fire and police pension association that are directly related to the association's administration of the plan shall be paid from that plan's assets. Any expenses incurred by the association that are attributable to more than one plan administered by the association shall be allocated to each plan on an equitable basis as determined by the association. The allocated expense shall be paid from the assets of each plan.

Taking such other actions as may be allowed or required by statute.

The governing body of a volunteer pension plan or its local pension board has the following responsibilities when the plan is affiliated with the fire and police pension association pursuant to subsection (1) of this section:

Establishing eligibility for and the amount of benefits to be received by members and beneficiaries of the plan, including the determination of base benefits, years of service under the plan, marital status, and continuing eligibility of retirees and survivors;

Electing options for the allocation of assets, if such options are provided by the fire and police pension association;

Maintaining records of the terms and provisions of the plan as they may be adopted and amended;

Making determinations regarding benefit improvements, if any; and

Periodically certifying information required by the fire and police pension association to administer the plan benefits.

A governing body that provides pension benefits for volunteer firefighters may terminate its affiliation with the fire and police pension association upon giving written notice to the association at least sixty days prior to the end of any quarter of a calendar year. The association may allow a shorter notice period. The association may terminate the affiliation of a volunteer plan upon sixty days written notice to the governing body for failure to fulfill its responsibilities to the plan or its failure to renew an affiliation agreement.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 926, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-024), ch. 51, p. 233, § 3, effective March 20.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1005 (1)(k).

31-31-706. Affiliation by exempt defined benefit pension plans.

At the request of any local employer having an exempt defined benefit pension plan, the board is authorized to make an agreement with the employer's governing body to manage such employer's exempt defined benefit pension plan fund for investment.

As an alternative to affiliation for investment management pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, at the request of any local employer having an exempt defined benefit pension plan, the board is authorized to make an agreement with the employer's governing body to incorporate the exempt defined benefit pension plan into the defined benefit system. The incorporation shall be under terms and conditions that are mutually agreeable to the employer's governing body and the board and as may be required to maintain the qualified status of the plan under the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended.

Prior to the implementation of an agreement of incorporation pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the board shall find that the incorporation is not projected to have an adverse actuarial impact on existing members of the defined benefit system. The board and the employer's governing body are authorized to take all actions necessary to accomplish the agreement and to maintain the qualified status of the formerly exempt defined benefit pension plan after incorporation into the defined benefit system. Notwithstanding any other requirement, an exempt defined benefit pension plan may be incorporated into the defined benefit system without the approval of the members of the exempt plan or the statewide plan.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(c) is effective until January 1, 2023.] The board may require that employees hired by the local employer with the formerly exempt defined benefit pension plan after the date of incorporation pursuant to this subsection (2) be members of the statewide defined benefit plan pursuant to part 4 of this article.

(c)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(c) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

The board may require that employees hired by the local employer with the formerly exempt defined benefit pension plan after the date of incorporation pursuant to this subsection (2) be members of the statewide retirement plan pursuant to article 31.5 of this title 31.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 926, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 309, § 1, effective April 14.

L. 2006:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, p. 196, § 22, effective March 31.

L. 2022:

(2)(c) amended, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 309, § 12, effective January 1, 2023.

Cross references:

For the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", see title 26 of the United States Code.

31-31-707. Multiple plan employers.

An employer with multiple plans may exercise its options of affiliation and withdrawal pursuant to this article on an individual plan basis.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 420, § 8, effective June 1.

31-31-708. Optional affiliation by county sheriff.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until January 1, 2023.

]

Any county that does not cover, under the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, salaried employees whose duties are directly involved with the provision of law enforcement or fire protection as certified by the county may elect coverage under the statewide defined benefit plan established in part 4 of this article 31 and the statewide death and disability plan established in part 8 of this article 31 by filing a resolution of affiliation with the board. Election of coverage under the plan is irrevocable. Such participation shall be as provided by rules adopted by the board. The board may determine a continuing rate of contribution for all members who are active on the effective date of coverage to fund benefits as may be necessary to ensure that the affiliating employers' coverage shall not have an adverse financial impact on the actuarial soundness of the plan.

31-31-708. Optional affiliation by county sheriff.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective January 1, 2023.

]

Any county that does not cover, under the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, salaried employees whose duties are directly involved with the provision of law enforcement or fire protection as certified by the county may elect coverage under the statewide retirement plan established in article 31.5 of this title 31 and the statewide death and disability plan established in part 8 of this article 31 by filing a resolution of affiliation with the board. Election of coverage under the plan is irrevocable. Such participation shall be as provided by rules adopted by the board. The board may determine a continuing rate of contribution for all members who are active on the effective date of coverage to fund benefits as may be necessary to ensure that the affiliating employers' coverage shall not have an adverse financial impact on the actuarial soundness of the plan.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1038), ch. 65, p. 168, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1044), ch. 105, p. 411, § 9, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 309, § 13, effective January 1, 2023.